Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2518HV (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 520 Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Five units of the social studies including 3 instruction in voting statutes and procedures, voter 4 registration requirements, the use of paper ballots and voting 5 systems in the election process, and the method of acquiring 6 and casting an absentee ballot. All students shall complete a 7 minimum of one-half one unit of United States government and 8 one unit of United States history. 9 (2) The one-half one unit of United States government shall 10 include the all of the following: 11 (a) The voting procedure as described in this lettered 12 paragraph and section 280.9A . The government instruction shall 13 also include a 14 (b) A study of the Constitution of the United States and the 15 Bill of Rights contained in the Constitution and an assessment 16 of a studentâs knowledge of the Constitution and the Bill of 17 Rights. 18 (c) Instruction related to civics, including the roles and 19 responsibilities of citizens in a society and in state and 20 local governments. 21 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 22 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 23 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The educational standards 24 established in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ , 25 related to United States government instruction. 26 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 27 by adding the following new paragraph: 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0q. Be subject to and comply with the 29 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ , 30 relating to United States government instruction in the same 31 manner as a school district. 32 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school years 33 beginning on or after July 1, 2026. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 2518HV (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 520 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to social studies instruction, including 3 instruction in United States government, provided to students 4 enrolled in grades 9 through 12. 5 The bill requires students enrolled in grades 9 through 12 6 in school districts, accredited nonpublic schools, charter 7 schools, and innovation zone schools to complete a minimum of 8 one unit of United States government instruction as part of the 9 social studies curriculum. The bill provides that the United 10 States government instruction shall include instruction related 11 to civics. Under current law, students enrolled in grades 9 12 through 12 in school districts and accredited nonpublic schools 13 are required to complete a minimum of one-half unit of United 14 States government instruction. 15 The bill applies to school years beginning on or after July 16 1, 2026. 17 -2- LSB 2518HV (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 2